en: Unknown
ar: غير معروف
bg: Неизвестно
cs: Neznámý, neznámá, neznámí, neznámé
da: Ukendt
de: Unbekannt
el: Άγνωστο, άγνωστη, άγνωστοι, άγνωστες
es: Desconocido, desconocida, desconocidos, desconocidas
et: Tundmatu
fi: Tuntematon
fr: Inconnu, inconnue, inconnus, inconnues
hu: Ismeretlen
it: Sconosciuto, sconosciuta, sconosciuti, sconosciute
ja: 不明
ko: 알 수 없음
lt: Nežinomas, nežinoma, nežinomi, nežinomos
lv: Nezināms, nezināma, nezināmi, nezināmas
nl: Onbekend
pl: Nieznany, nieznana, nieznani, nieznane
pt: Desconhecido, desconhecida, desconhecidos, desconhecidas
ro: Necunoscut, necunoscută, necunoscuți, necunoscute
ru: Неизвестно
sk: Neznámy, neznáma, neznámi, neznáme
sl: Neznano
sv: Okänd, okända
tr: Bilinmeyen
uk: Невідомо
zh: 未知

en: packaging
bg: опаковка
ca: embalatge
cs: zabalení
de: Verpackung
el: αμπαλάρισμα
fi: pakkausmateriaali
fr: emballage
hy: փաթեթավորում
id: kemasan
it: imballaggio
nl: verpakking
pl: opakowanie
ru: упако́вка
sq: pako, paketë
sv: förpackningsmaterial

en: packet, pack, packs, packets, package
ar: حُزْمَة
az: paket
be: паке́т
bg: пакет, пакети, паке́тче
bn: প্যাকেট
ca: paquet
cs: balíček
cy: pecyn
da: pakke
de: Packung, Paket, Päckchen
el: πακέτο
eo: pako
es: paquete, paquetes
et: pakett, pakk
eu: pakete
fa: پاکت
fi: paketti
fr: paquet, pack, paquets, packs, packet, packets
gd: pacaid
he: חֲבִילָה
hi: पैकेट
hu: csomag
hy: կապոց
is: pakki
it: pacchetto
ja: パケット
ka: პაკეტი
kk: пакет
km: បេ
ko: 패킷
ky: пакет
lo: ຫໍ່
lt: pakelis
lv: paciņa
mk: пакет
mn: пакет
mo: pākete
my: အထုပ်
nl: Pakket, pak, pakken
no: pakke
pl: paczka
pt: pacote
ro: pachet
ru: паке́т
sh: замотуљак, zamotuljak
sk: balíček
sl: paket
sv: paket
sw: pakiti
tg: пакет
th: ห่อ
tm: paket
tr: paket
uk: паке́т
uz: paket
vi: gói
zh: 包

en: Tray, trays, tray with indents, shell, shells
bg: Тарелка
de: Schale, Menüschale, Tablettverpackung
fr: Barquette, barquettes, Plateau, plateaux, tablette, tablettes, fond, fonds, coque, coques, présentoir, présentoirs, bac, bacs, barquette / coque
hu: Tálca, tálcák
it: Vaschetta
nl: Tray
pl: Tacka
pt: Tabuleiro, cuvete, tabuleiros, cuvetes, couvete, couvetes

en: Jar, jars
bg: Буркан, буркани
de: Schraubglas, Schraubgläser, Einmachglas, Einmachgläser, Konservenglas, Konservengläser
el: Βάζο
es: Tarro
fr: Bocal, bocaux
hu: Befőttes üveg, befőttes üvegek
it: Vasetto, Barattolo
nl: Pot, Potten, Bokaal, Bokaalen
pl: Słoik
pt: Jarro, jarros, jarra, jarras
ro: Borcan
sv: burk, burken

en: Box, boxes
bg: Кутия, кутии
de: Schachtel, Schachteln, Faltschachtel, Karton, Kasten
el: Κουτί
es: caja, cajas
fr: Boîte, boîtes, boite, boites, boitier, boitiers, coffret, coffrets, Boîte / Coffret
hr: kutija
hu: Doboz, dobozok
it: Scatola, scatole, astuccio, scatoletta
nl: Doos, doosje, Dozen, Doosjes, Pakje, Pakjes
pl: Pudełko, Pudło
pt: Caixa, caixas

en: egg carton, egg box, egg tray
da: æggebakke, ægbakke
de: Eierkarton
fr: Boîte à œufs
it: scatola di uova, scatola delle uova
ja: 卵パック
nl: eierdoos
pl: Wytłaczanka, Wytłoczka
sv: äggkartong
tr: Yumurta kartonu

en: Pizza box
da: pizzabakke
de: Pizzakarton
fr: carton à pizza
it: Cartone della pizza
nl: Pizzadoos, pizzadozen
sv: pizzakartong

en: pill box
da: pilleæske
de: Pillendose
fr: pilulier
it: scatola per pillole
nl: pillendoos
pt: caixa de comprimidos

en: Case, cases
de: Kiste, Kisten
fr: Caisse, caisses, caissette, caissettes
it: Cassa, casse
nl: Kist, kisten
pt: Engradado, engradados

en: Jug or canister, canister or jug
fr: Bidon ou bonbonne, bonbonne ou bidon
it: Caraffa o barattolo, lattina o caraffa

en: Jug, jugs
de: Kanne, Krug
fr: Bidon, bidons
it: Caraffa
nl: Kruik, kruiken
pt: garrafão

en: Bottle or vial, Vial or bottle
bg: Бутилка или флакон, флакон или бутилка
de: Flasche oder Fläschchen, Fläschchen oder Flasche
es: Botella o frasco, frasco o botella
fr: Bouteille ou Flacon, Flacon ou bouteille
it: Bottiglia o flacona, flacone o bottigia
nl: Fles of flacon, flacon of fles
pt: Garrafa ou frasco, frasco ou garrafa

en: Bottle, bottles
bg: Бутилка, бутилки
da: Flaske, flasker
de: Flasche, Flaschen
el: Μπουκάλι
es: botella, botellas
fr: Bouteille, bouteilles
hr: boca
hu: Palack, palackok
it: Bottiglia
nl: Fles, Flessen
pl: Butelka
pt: Garrafa, garrafas
ro: sticle
sv: Flaska

en: hip flask
ca: petaca
cs: placatka
de: Flachmann, Taschenflasche
el: φλασκί
es: petaca, licorera
fi: taskumatti
fr: flasque
hu: lapos üveg
it: fiaschetta
lt: Kišeninė gertuvė
nl: heupfles
nn: Lommelerke
pl: Piersiówka
ru: фляжка
sk: čutora
sv: plunta

en: Brick, brick carton, brick shaped carton, bricks, brick cartons, brick shaped cartons
de: Getränkekarton, Getränkeverbundkarton, Milchkarton, Ziegel, Ziegelkarton, ziegelsteinförmiger Karton, Ziegelkartons, ziegelsteinförmige Kartons
fr: Brique, briques, brique alimentaire, briques alimentaires
hu: tégla, tégladoboz, tégla doboz, tégla karton, tégla alakú karton
nl: Drankkarton, Melkpak, Drankenkartons, Drankencarton, Drankenkarton, Drinkpahk, Drinkpakken

en: small brick, small bricks
de: Trinkpäckchen, Saftpäckchen, Milchpäckchen
fr: briquette, briquettes
nl: briquette, briquettes

en: Can, cans
bg: Консерва или кен
da: Dåse, dåser
de: Dose, Dosen
es: Lata
fr: Boîte de conserve ou canette, boîtes de conserve ou canettes
hr: limenka
hu: konzervdoboz, konzerv
it: Lattina, Latta
nl: Bus
pl: Puszka
pt: Lata, latas

en: Drink can, beverage can, drink cans, beverage cans
bg: Кен, кенче
de: Getränkedose
es: Lata de bebida
fr: Canette, cannette, canettes, cannettes, boîte boisson, boites boissons
hu: italos konzerv, italkonzerv, konzervital
it: Lattina per bevande
nl: Blikje, Blikjes
pl: Puszka na napoje
pt: Lata de bebida, latas de bebidas, lata de alumínio, latas de alumínio, lata de refrigerante, latas de refrigerante, lata de refrigerantes, latas de refrigerantes

en: Food can, tin, tin can
bg: консерва за храна
de: Konservendose
es: Lata de comida
fr: Boîte de conserve, boîtes de conserves
hu: ételes konzerv, ételkonzerv, konzervétel
it: Lattina di cibo
nl: Conservenblik
pl: Puszka na żywność
pt: Lata de alimentos, latas de alimentos, lata de alimento, latas de alimento, lata de conserva, lata de conservas, latas de conserva, latas de conservas, lata de comida, latas de comida, lata de comidas, latas de comidas, lata para alimentos, latas para alimentos, lata para alimento, latas para alimento